Illinois, session 104th, HB4899.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)7    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 8    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 9hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 10if:11        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 12    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 13    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 14    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 15    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 16    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 17    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 18    or persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case;20        (1.5) the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 21    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 22    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 23    of the case, and the defendant is charged with a forcible   HB4899- 2 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    felony, which as used in this Section, means treason, 2    first degree murder, second degree murder, predatory 3    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 4    sexual assault, criminal sexual assault, armed robbery, 5    aggravated robbery, robbery, burglary where there is use 6    of force against another person, residential burglary, 7    home invasion, vehicular invasion, aggravated arson, 8    arson, aggravated kidnaping, kidnaping, aggravated battery 9    resulting in great bodily harm or permanent disability or 10    disfigurement, or any other felony which involves the 11    threat of or infliction of great bodily harm or permanent 12    disability or disfigurement; 13        (2) the defendant is charged with stalking or 14    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 15    defendant's pretrial pre-trial release poses a real and 16    present threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged 17    offense, based on the specific articulable facts of the 18    case and denial of release is necessary to prevent 19    fulfillment of the threat upon which the charge is based;20        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 21    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 22    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 23    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 24    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or a civil no contact 25    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 26    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release   HB4899- 3 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 2    or persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case;4        (4) the defendant is charged with domestic battery or 5    aggravated domestic battery under Section 12-3.2 or 12-3.3 6    of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is alleged that the 7    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 8    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 9    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 10    case;11        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 12    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 13    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 14    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 15    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 16    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 17    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 18    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 19    the case; 20        (6) the defendant is charged with any of the following 21    offenses under the Criminal Code of 2012, and it is 22    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 23    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 24    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 25    of the case:26            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a   HB4899- 4 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1        firearm);2            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a 3        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 4        designed or used for silencing the report of a 5        firearm);6            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 7        firearm);8            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 9        firearm by a repeat felony offender);10            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 11        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 12        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 13        or flechette shells);14            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 15        firearms);16            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 17        firearms on the premises of any school);18            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 19        liquor license);20            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 21        firearm);22            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);23            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);24            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);25            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 26        of a minor);  HB4899- 5 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);2            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 3        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 4        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 5        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 6        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 7        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 8            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 9        manslaughter);10            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);11            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);12            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 13        endangerment);14            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 15            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 16        restraint); 17            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 18            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 19        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 20        discharge of a firearm); 21        (6.5) the defendant is charged with any of the 22    following offenses, and it is alleged that the defendant's 23    pretrial release poses a real and present threat to the 24    safety of any person or persons or the community, based on 25    the specific articulable facts of the case: 26            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or   HB4899- 6 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 2        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);3            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 4        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 5        influence while operating a school bus with 6        passengers);7            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 8        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 9        influence causing great bodily harm);10            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence after a previous reckless homicide 13        conviction);14            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 15        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 16        influence leading to death); or17            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 18        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 19        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 20        under the age of 16);21        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 22    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (6.5), and it 23    is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a 24    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 25    persons or the community, based on the specific 26    articulable facts of the case; or   HB4899- 7 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 2    to avoid prosecution and is charged with:3            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 4        through (a)(7) of this Section; or5            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 6    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 7detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 8probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 9a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 10been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 11indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 12probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 13finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 14misdemeanor.15    (c) Timing of petition. 16        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 17    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 18    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 19    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 20    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 21    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 22    previously released shall not be detained.23        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 24    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 25    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 26    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first   HB4899- 8 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 2    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 3    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 4    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 5    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 6    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 7    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 8    filing of the petition and the hearing.9    (d) Contents of petition.10        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 11    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 12    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 13    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 14    persons or the community, based on the specific 15    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.16        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 17    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 18    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 19    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 20    filing of the previous petition.21    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 22for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 23proving by clear and convincing evidence that:24        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 25    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 26    subsection (a), and  HB4899- 9 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 2    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 3    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 4    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 5    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 6    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 7    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 8    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 9    1986, and10        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 11    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 12    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 13    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 14    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses 15    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 16    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 17    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and18        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 19    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 20    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 21    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 22    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 23    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 24    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 25    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 26    appear in court as required.  HB4899- 10 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    (f) Conduct of the hearings.2        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 3    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 4    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 5    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 6    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 7    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 8    hearing.9        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 10    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.11        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 12    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 13    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 14    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her 15    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 16    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 17    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 18    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 19    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 20    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 21    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 22    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 23    conducted via a 2-way audio-visual communication system, 24    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 25    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 26        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be   HB4899- 11 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 2    audio visual communication) unless the accused waives the 3    right to be present physically in court, the court 4    determines that the physical health and safety of any 5    person necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by 6    appearing in court, or the chief judge of the circuit 7    orders use of that system due to operational challenges in 8    conducting the hearing in person. Such operational 9    challenges must be documented and approved by the chief 10    judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the challenges 11    through reasonable efforts must be presented and approved 12    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts every 13    6 months. 14        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining 15    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 16    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 17    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 18    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 19    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 20    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 21    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 22    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 23    the court shall state on the record the reason for 24    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 25    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 26    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the   HB4899- 12 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 2    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 3    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 4    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 5    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 6    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 7    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 8    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 9    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 10    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 11    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 12    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 13    criminal history, if available, and any written or 14    recorded statements and the substance of any oral 15    statements made by any person, if in the State's 16    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 17        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 18    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 19    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 20    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 21    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 22    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 23    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 24    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 25    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.26        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or   HB4899- 13 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 2    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 3    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 4    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 5    the defendant.6        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 7    release, and detention prior to trial must be 8    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 9    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 10    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 11    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 12dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 13defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 14person or persons or the community, based on the specific 15articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 16limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:17        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 18    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 19    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.20        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 21    including:22            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 23        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 24        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 25        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 26        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil   HB4899- 14 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.2            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 3        psychiatric or other similar social history which 4        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 5        nature, or lack of any such history.6        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 7    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 8    nature of the threat.9        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 10    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 11    them.12        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.13        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 14    complaining witness. 15        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 16    access to any weapon or weapons.17        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 18    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 19    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 20    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 21    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 22    federal or State law.23        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 24    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 25    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 26    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior,   HB4899- 15 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    or lack of such behavior.2    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 3detention:4        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 5    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 6    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 7    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 8    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 9    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 10    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;11        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 12    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 13    pending trial;14        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable 15    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 16    communication with others of his or her choice by 17    visitation, mail and telephone; and18        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 19    required for appearances in connection with court 20    proceedings.21    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 22detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 23Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 24offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 25on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 26is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by   HB4899- 16 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 2release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 3any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 4the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 5from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 6good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.7    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 8before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 9is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 10of any person or persons or the community, based on the 11specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 12defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 13    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 14entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section 15denying his or her pretrial release.16    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 17this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 18release.19    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 20shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 21defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 22proceedings.23    (m) Interest of victims. 24        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 25    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 26    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime   HB4899- 17 -LRB104 17021 RLC 30436 b1    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 2    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 3        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 4    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 5    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 6    defendant remains in custody. 7(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)